test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-liepaa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - liepā: # Noun 29 'eng /est lepp/fin' - full paradigm
     liepā+N+Sg+Nom: liepā
     liepā+N+Sg+Gen: liepā
     liepā+N+Sg+Par: lieppõ
     liepā+N+Sg+Dat: liepān
     liepā+N+Sg+Ins: liepāks
     liepā+N+Sg+Ill: lieppõ
     liepā+N+Sg+Ela: liepāst
     liepā+N+Pl+Nom: liepād
     liepā+N+Pl+Gen: liepād
     liepā+N+Pl+Par: lepți
     liepā+N+Pl+Dat: liepādõn
     liepā+N+Pl+Ins: liepādõks
     liepā+N+Pl+Ill: liepīž
     liepā+N+Pl+Ela: liepīst
